Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201854-1,130
Livestock auction market or packing plant; election; how made.

The election provided for by section 54-1,129 shall
be made by (1) filing with the Secretary of State, in form to be prescribed
by the secretary, a written notice of such election and agreement to be bound
by section 54-1,131 and (2) posting conspicuously
on the premises a notice of the fact that brand inspection is provided at
such livestock auction market or packing plant.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 29, p. 973;

Laws 1987, LB 450, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 54-1184;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 3.